North Dakota, session 69, HB1076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 37-01-48 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-01-48. Payment of death benefits.
The national guard may pay a death benefit to a designated beneficiary, or to the next of kin, of a
national guard service member who died while serving in a state active duty status under this chapter.
The payment of a death benefit may not exceed fifteen thousandone hundred thousand dollars and is
subject to available funds. The adjutant general may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1076 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1076 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State